District of Columbia statutes.
19-1515

Recording of disclaimer.

If an instrument transferring an interest in or power over property subject to a disclaimer is required or permitted by law to be filed, recorded, or registered, the disclaimer may be so filed, recorded, or registered. Except as provided in [§] 19-1512(g)(2), failure to file, record, or register the disclaimer does not affect its validity as between the disclaimant and persons to whom the property interest or power passes by reason of the disclaimer.

Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-205, § 2(b), 53 DCR 9063
Mar. 19, 2013, D.C. Law 19-230, § 3(b), 59 DCR 13606

History

The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 19-230 added “Except as provided in section 19-1512(g)(2)” at the beginning of the second sentence; and made related changes.

Effect of Amendments

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 15 of the Uniform Disclaimer of Property Interests Act (1999).

Editor's Notes